src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Skolt Saami noun morphology 

This file documents the Skolt Saami noun morphology, lexicon by lexicon.
cf. Mosnikoff et al 2020: 356
the notions of vowels in 9 rows A–I, and 5 columns
|(A)|a|ä|aʹ|äʹ|äʹ|
|(B)|õ|â|õʹ|âʹ|âʹ|
|(C)|u|o|uʹ|oʹ|uʹ|
|(D)|o|å|oʹ|åʹ|åʹ|
|(E)|i|e|iʹ|eʹ|eʹ|
|(F)|uõ|uâ|uõʹ|ueʹ (<*uâʹ)| ueʹ|
|(G)|uå|uä|ueʹ (<*uåʹ)|uäʹ/uẹʹ|uẹ /uäʹ|
|(H)|iõ|eâ|iõʹ|ieʹ (<*eâʹ)|ieʹ (<*eâʹ)|
|(I)|iâ|eä|ieʹ (<*iâʹ)|eäʹ/uẹʹ|eäʹ/uẹʹ|

F4,F5, G4, G5, H4, H5, I4, I5 are problematic, and for this reason they are not given as in the book,
diphthong + XX and YX -> uẹʹ, iẹʹ
diphthong + XˈX and YXX -> uäʹ, eäʹ
column 1 is high; column 2 is low; column 3 is high with soft sign;
column 4 represents (vowel + XˈX and YXX) context found in +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 (cf. Mosnikoff et al 2020)
column 5 is low with monophthongs and analogically low with diphthongs (see Rueter, 2025 )

## Unclassified words

* LEXICON N_  FOR (STILL) UNCLASSIFIED INCOMING NOUNS.

IRREGULAR NOUN nijdd
* LEXICON N_NIJDD  nijdd:ni

* LEXICON	NMN_NIJDD	 nijdd:ni
* Yaml: **N-nijdd**
NMN_1Â_IJCC
* :jdd SG-NOM ;			 nijdd
* :jdd%>â ESS/PAR ; 	  		 nijddân, nijddâd
strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
* :%{ʹØ%}jdd%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		 niʹjdde
strong_geminate, long_vowel
* :õđ SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 niõđ
* :õđ%>â SG-LOC ;		 niõđâst
* :õđ SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	 niõđ, niõđid, niõđid, niõđin, niõđivuiʹm, niõđitaa

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:õđ N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   niõđ-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:õ%{ʹØ%}đ%^PAL N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;   niõʹđ-

* +Err/GenreLeudd:õđâ SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;      niõđ Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/GenreLeudd:õđâ SG-COM_N ;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* nijdd # examples:*
* *nijdd:* `nijdd+N+Sg+Nom`
* *niõđ:* `nijdd+N+Sg+Gen`
* *niõđ:* `nijdd+N+Sg+Acc`
* *niʹjdde:* `nijdd+N+Sg+Ill`
* *niõđâst:* `nijdd+N+Sg+Loc`
* *niõđstad:* `nijdd+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1`
* *niõđin:* `nijdd+N+Sg+Com`
* *nijddân:* `nijdd+N+Ess`
* *nijddâd:* `nijdd+N+Par`
* *niõđtaa:* `nijdd+N+Sg+Abe`
* *niõđ:* `nijdd+N+Pl+Nom`
* *niõđi:* `nijdd+N+Pl+Gen`
* *niõđid:* `nijdd+N+Pl+Acc`
* *niõđid:* `nijdd+N+Pl+Ill`
* *niõđin:* `nijdd+N+Pl+Loc`
* *niõđivuiʹm:* `nijdd+N+Pl+Com`
* *niõđitaa:* `nijdd+N+Pl+Abe`
* *niõđâž:* `nijdd+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *niõʹđe:* `nijdd+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen`

CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
* LEXICON N_1Â_VCC  papp:pa%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}pp
similar_to: N_PESS
pa%{a0%}%{ʹ0%}%{p0%}p
V%{V0%}%{ʹ0%}%{C0%}C
Sg_Nom:
high-vowel=yes
monophthong=yes
long-vowel=yes
palatalization=no
consonantism=quant-gem
long-consonant=yes

1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|geminate" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|geminate" 

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-papp**
strong_geminate, short_vowel
* : SG-NOM ;			 papp
* :%>â ESS/PAR ; 	  		 pappân, pappâd

strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
* :%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		 paʹppe
* :%^PAL N2A_LUOQSSI ;		 N»A: paʹppi

strong_geminate, long_vowel
* :%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 paapp
* :%^V2VV%>â SG-LOC ;		 paappâst
* :%^V2VV SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	 paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   paapp-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;   paaʹpp-
papp+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
paʹpstes

e.g. 
e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg3 pp:p papstes

* +Cmp/SgNom: R ;           papp
* :%^V2VV PL-NOM ;  paapp
* :%^V2VV PL-OBL ;       paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa
* :%>â ESS/PAR ;                   pappân, pappâd

* papp #  examples:*
* *papp:* `papp+N+Sg+Nom`
* *paapp:* `papp+N+Sg+Gen`
* *paapp:* `papp+N+Sg+Acc`
* *paʹppe:* `papp+N+Sg+Ill`
* *paappâst:* `papp+N+Sg+Loc`
* *papstan:* `papp+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1`
* *paappstan:* `papp+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1`
* *paappin:* `papp+N+Sg+Com`
* *pappân:* `papp+N+Ess`
* *pappâd:* `papp+N+Par`
* *paapptaa:* `papp+N+Sg+Abe`
* *paapp:* `papp+N+Pl+Nom`
* *paappi:* `papp+N+Pl+Gen`
* *paappid:* `papp+N+Pl+Acc`
* *paappid:* `papp+N+Pl+Ill`
* *paappin:* `papp+N+Pl+Loc`
* *paappivuiʹm:* `papp+N+Pl+Com`
* *paappitaa:* `papp+N+Pl+Abe`
* *paappâž:* `papp+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *paaʹppe:* `papp+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen`

* Yaml: **N-pakk**
strong_geminate, short_vowel
* : SG-NOM ;			 papp
* :%>â ESS/PAR ; 	  		 pappân, pappâd

strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
* :%^PAL%^PALK%>e SG-ILL ;		 paʹppe
* :%^PAL%^PALK N2A_LUOQSSI ;		 N»A: paʹppi

strong_geminate, long_vowel
* :%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 paapp
* :%^V2VV%>â SG-LOC ;		 paappâst
* :%^V2VV SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	 paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   paapp-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^PALK N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;   paaʹpp-
papp+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
paʹpstes

e.g. 
e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg3 pp:p papstes

* LEXICON N_1Â_VYKK_errorth 
* LEXICON N_1Â_VYKK  algg:a%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}lgg
* Yaml: **N-algg**

* : SG-NOM ;	    				 põrtt

* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		 põõrt
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;		 põõrt
* :%^PAL%^PALK%>e SG-ILL ;		      		 põʹrtte
* :%^PAL%^PALK N2A_LUOQSSI ;		      	 põʹrtti
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%>â SG-LOC ;			 põõrtâst
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-COM_IN ;			 põõrtin
* :%>â ESS/PAR ; 		  			 põrttân
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;			 põõrti

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   põõrt-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;   põõʹrt-

* LEXICON N_1Â_VYXX  põrtt:põ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}rtt
Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_xyy
similar_to: N_TAALKYS, N_KOONTYR
1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|long_cluster" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|short_cluster" 

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-algg**

* : SG-NOM ;	    				 põrtt

* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		 põõrt
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;		 põõrt
* :%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		      		 põʹrtte
* :%^PAL N2A_LUOQSSI ;		      	 põʹrtti
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%>â SG-LOC ;			 põõrtâst
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-COM_IN ;			 põõrtin
* :%>â ESS/PAR ; 		  			 põrttân
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;			 põõrti

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   põõrt-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;   põõʹrt-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL-ALLEGRO ;  põʹrt-

* LEXICON N_1Â_VYKK_PL  aalǥ:algg
* +Cmp/SgNom: R ;                            põrtt
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;                 põõrt
* :%>â ESS/PAR ;                                   põrttân
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;                         põõrti

* LEXICON N_1Â_VYXX_PL  põõrt:põrtt
* +Cmp/SgNom: R ;                            põrtt
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;                 põõrt
* :%>â ESS/PAR ;                                   põrttân
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;                         põõrti

* algg #  examples:*
* *algg:* `algg+N+Sg+Nom`
* *aalǥ:* `algg+N+Sg+Gen`
* *aalǥ:* `algg+N+Sg+Acc`
* *aʹlǧǧe:* `algg+N+Sg+Ill`
* *aalǥâst:* `algg+N+Sg+Loc`
* *alǥstan:* `algg+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1`
* *aalǥstan:* `algg+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1`
* *aalǥin:* `algg+N+Sg+Com`
* *alggân:* `algg+N+Ess`
* *alggâd:* `algg+N+Par`
* *alǥtaa:* `algg+N+Sg+Abe`
* *aalǥ:* `algg+N+Pl+Nom`
* *aalǥi:* `algg+N+Pl+Gen`
* *aalǥid:* `algg+N+Pl+Acc`
* *aalǥid:* `algg+N+Pl+Ill`
* *aalǥin:* `algg+N+Pl+Loc`
* *aalǥivuiʹm:* `algg+N+Pl+Com`
* *aalǥitaa:* `algg+N+Pl+Abe`
* *aalǥâž:* `algg+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *aaʹlje:* `algg+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen`

* LEXICON N_1Â_VUKK  joukk:jo%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}kk
* Yaml: **N-autt**

* : SG-NOM ;	    				 autt
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		 aaut
* :%^PAL%^PALK%>e SG-ILL ;		      		 auʹtte
* :%^PAL%^PALK N2A_LUOQSSI ;			 auʹtte
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%>â SG-LOC ;			 aautâst
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-COM_IN ;			 aautin
* :%>â ESS/PAR ; 		  			 auttân
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;		 aaut
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;			 aauti

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   aaut-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;   aauʹt-

* LEXICON N_1Â_VUCC  autt:a%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}tt
Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_vyy
1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|long_V-cluster" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|short_V-cluster"

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-autt**

* : SG-NOM ;	    				 autt
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		 aaut
* :%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		      		 auʹtte
* :%^PAL N2A_LUOQSSI ;			 auʹtte
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%>â SG-LOC ;			 aautâst
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-COM_IN ;			 aautin
* :%>â ESS/PAR ; 		  			 auttân
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;		 aaut
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;			 aauti

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   aaut-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;   aauʹt-

* LEXICON N_1Â_VUCC_PL  aaut:a%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}tt
* +Cmp/SgNom: R ;                            autt
* :%>â ESS/PAR ;                                   auttân
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;                 aaut
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;                         aauti

* autt # examples:*
* *autt:* `autt+N+Sg+Nom`
* *aaut:* `autt+N+Sg+Gen`
* *aaut:* `autt+N+Sg+Acc`
* *auʹtte:* `autt+N+Sg+Ill`
* *aautâst:* `autt+N+Sg+Loc`
* *autstan:* `autt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1`
* *aautin:* `autt+N+Sg+Com`
* *auttân:* `autt+N+Ess`
* *auttâd:* `autt+N+Par`
* *auttaa:* `autt+N+Sg+Abe`
* *aaut:* `autt+N+Pl+Nom`
* *aauti:* `autt+N+Pl+Gen`
* *aautid:* `autt+N+Pl+Acc`
* *aautid:* `autt+N+Pl+Ill`
* *aautin:* `autt+N+Pl+Loc`
* *aautivuiʹm:* `autt+N+Pl+Com`
* *aautitaa:* `autt+N+Pl+Abe`
* *aautâž:* `autt+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *aauʹte:* `autt+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen`

* LEXICON N_1Â_VHCC  vahtt:va%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}h%{ʹØ%}tt
* LEXICON N_VAHTT  vahtt:va%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}h%{ʹØ%}tt
N_1Â_VHCC cf. SIJDD
Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_hyy
1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|h-cluster" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|short_u-cluster" 
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-vahtt**
